California, session 20252026, SB231.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21083.06 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21083.06. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall consult with regional, local, state, and federal agencies to develop a technical advisory on thresholds of significance for greenhouse gas and noise pollution effects on the environment to assist local agencies. The technical advisory shall provide suggested thresholds of significance for all areas of the state. In developing the suggested thresholds of significance for specific areas of the state, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may consider all of the following: (1) If the area is rural or urban.(2) The applicable air district.(3) Disadvantaged communities as designated by CalEnviroScreen.(4) The California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) and the California Noise Control Act of 1973 (Division 28 (commencing with Section 46000) of the Health and Safety Code) as applicable. (5) Any other factor relevant to determine the suggested threshold of significance for a specific area.(b) Lead agencies may elect to adopt the suggested thresholds of significance provided in the technical advisory.(c) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall post the technical advisory prepared pursuant to this section on its internet website.SECTION 1.Section 21083.06 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21083.06.(a)On or before July 1, 2027, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall prepare and develop, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall certify and adopt, guidelines in Appendix O of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations to establish best practices for public agencies to follow in determining whether or not a proposed project may have a significant effect on the environment, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 21083, when completing Appendix G of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations. The best practices shall consider, and include identifiable thresholds of significance based on, all of the following:(1)The California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) for greenhouse gas emissions.(2)The federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.) for vehicle miles traveled.(3)The California Noise Control Act of 1973 (Division 28 (commencing with Section 46000) of the Health and Safety Code) for noise pollution.(b)In developing guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a), the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may consult with local, regional, state, and federal agencies that have authority and expertise on those subjects.